North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 56. North Carolina Commercial Fertilizer Law.
§ 106-671.
Inspection fees; reporting system.

For the purpose of defraying expenses on the inspection and of otherwise determining the value of commercial fertilizers in this State, there shall be paid to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services a charge of fifty cents (50¢) per ton on all commercial fertilizers other than packages of five pounds or less. Inspection fees shall be paid on all tonnage distributed into North Carolina to any person not having a valid reporting permit. Individual packages of five pounds or less shall be exempt from the tonnage fee; provided that any per annum (fiscal) tonnage of any brand sold in excess of one hundred tons shall be subject to the charge of fifty cents (50¢) per ton on any amount in excess of one hundred tons as provided herein. Whenever any manufacturer of commercial fertilizer shall have paid the charges required by this section his goods shall not be liable to further tax, whether by city, town, or county; provided, this shall not exempt the commercial fertilizers from an ad valorem tax.

Reporting System. — Each manufacturer, importer, jobber, firm, corporation or person who distributes commercial fertilizers in this State shall make application to the Commissioner for a permit to report the tonnage of commercial fertilizer sold and shall pay to the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services an inspection fee of fifty cents (50¢) per ton. The Commissioner is authorized to require each such distributor to keep such records as may be necessary to indicate accurately the tonnage of commercial fertilizers sold in the State, and as are satisfactory to the Commissioner. Such records shall be available to the Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s duly authorized representative, at any and all reasonable hours for the purpose of making such examination as is necessary to verify the tonnage statement and the inspection fees paid. If the records are available electronically, the electronic records shall be made available to the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative. Each registrant shall report monthly the tonnage sold to non-registrants on forms furnished by the Commissioner. Such reports shall be made and inspection fees shall be due and payable monthly on the fifteenth of each month covering the tonnage and kind of commercial fertilizers sold during the past month. If the report is not filed and the inspection fee paid by the last day of the month it is due, the amount due shall bear a penalty of ten percent (10%), which shall be added to the inspection fee due. If the report is not filed and the inspection fee paid within 60 days of the date due, or if the report or tonnage be false, the Commissioner may revoke the permit.

History.

1947, c. 1086, s. 6; 1949, c. 637, s. 3; 1959, c. 706, ss. 6, 7; 1973, c. 611, s. 5; 1977, c. 303, s. 17; 1991, c. 98, s. 2; 1997-261, s. 109; 2009-451, s. 11.1; 2011-145, s. 31.8(a); 2013-360, s. 13.9(b); 2021-78, s. 8(d).

§ 106-672.
Declaration of policy.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that it is in the public interest that the State regulate the activities of those persons engaged in the business of preparing, mixing, or manufacturing commercial fertilizers, in order to insure the manufacturer, distributor and consumer of the correct quantity and quality of all commercial fertilizer sold or offered for sale in this State. It shall therefore be the policy of this State to regulate the activities of those persons engaged in the business of preparing, mixing or manufacturing commercial fertilizer.

History.

1977, c. 303, s. 18.

§ 106-673.
Authority of Board of Agriculture to make rules and regulations.

Because legislation with regard to commercial fertilizer sold or offered for sale in this State must be adapted to complex conditions and standards involving numerous details with which the General Assembly cannot deal directly and in order to effectuate the purposes and policies of this Article, and in order to insure the manufacturer, distributor, and consumer of the correct quality and quantity of all commercial fertilizer sold or offered for sale in this State, the Board of Agriculture shall have the authority to make rules and regulations with respect to:

The maximum chlorine guarantee permitted for tobacco fertilizer;

The maximum chlorine guarantee permitted in tobacco top dressers;

Which grades of fertilizer may be branded top dressers;

The labeling of the grade of fertilizer when such fertilizer is sold in plain or unbranded bags;

The labeling requirements for all containers of liquid commercial fertilizer for direct application to the soil;

The bag sizes which may be used in the sale of commercial fertilizer;

The labeling requirements for packages containing a combination of any nonfertilizer material and mixed tobacco fertilizer;

Registration and labeling requirements for grades and brands of fertilizer carrying any guarantee of boron; the tolerance allowances for the percentage of boron in fertilizer mixtures;

The required composition for boron-landplaster mixtures before they may be registered and sold for use on peanuts in this State; the labeling requirements for each container of such mixture;

The monetary penalties assessed for excesses or deficiencies of boron and all other minor elements above or below the tolerances allowed;

The registration and labeling of general crop grades and tobacco grades;

The method, and the time limitations for the reporting to the Commissioner of Agriculture of the tonnage of each grade of fertilizer shipped to each destination in the State by each manufacturer or firm having fertilizer registered in this State;

The required composition, before such mixtures may be registered and sold in this State, of fertilizer-pesticide, landplaster-pesticide, and fertilizer-landplaster-pesticide, when to be used for peanuts alone;

The labeling and bag requirements of fertilizer- landplaster-pesticide mixtures;

The standards and requirements which must be met before fertilizer-pesticide mixtures may be registered in this State. These requirements may include, but are not limited to, approval in North Carolina of both the pesticide and the fertilizer grades, approval of the mixture by the Board of Agriculture, and any labeling requirements;

The standards and requirements which must be complied with before fertilizers-pesticides may, without registering the mixture, be mixed for direct application at the farmer’s request;

Requests for mixing any pesticide with fertilizer, for products not previously approved by the Board of Agriculture;

Packaging requirements for fertilizer-pesticide mixtures sold either in bulk or in bags, such that dusting, spillage, sifting, or a loss of any fertilizer-pesticide mixture will not occur;

The percentages of nitrogen required to be in nitrogen solutions, before such solutions may be registered and sold in this State;

The labeling of fertilizer products to ascertain their compliance to the Fertilizer or Lime and Landplaster Law;

Requesting substantiating data to back up claims made about a fertilizer product; registration may be denied if such data is not furnished;

The denial of approval of the registration of fertilizer products when such products will not, when used as directed, supply deficient needs of a plant;

Safety requirements for the movement, handling and storage of fluid fertilizers;

Standards and requirements for equipment and tanks for handling liquid fertilizer;

Refusing registration as a result of information or recommendations from the director of research stations;

Establishing minimum guarantees permissible for registering secondary elements and micronutrients;

Establishing minimum standards for containment of fertilizer materials in storage to prevent contamination of groundwater and surface water; and

Standards and labeling requirements for specialty fertilizers.

History.

1947, c. 1086, s. 15; 1949, c. 637, s. 4; 1977, c. 303, s. 19; 1991, c. 100, s. 1; 1993, c. 216, s. 2.

§ 106-674.
Short weight.

If any commercial fertilizer in the possession of the consumer is found by the Commissioner to be short in weight, the registrant of said commercial fertilizer shall within 30 days after official notice from the Commissioner pay to the consumer a penalty equal to four times the value of the actual shortage. The Commissioner may in his discretion allow reasonable tolerance for short weight due to loss through handling and transporting.

History.

1947, c. 1086, s. 16; 1977, c. 303, s. 20.

§ 106-675.
Publication of information concerning fertilizers.

The Commissioner shall publish at least annually, in such forms as he may deem proper, complete information concerning the sales of commercial fertilizers, together with a report of the results of the analyses based on official samples of commercial fertilizers sold or offered for sale within the State; such data on their production and use as he may consider advisable; provided, however, that the information concerning production and use of commercial fertilizers shall be shown separately for periods July first to December thirty-first and January first to June thirtieth of each year, and that no disclosure shall be made of the operations of any person.

History.

1947, c. 1086, s. 14; 1959, c. 706, s. 9; 1977, c. 303, s. 21.

§ 106-676.
Sales or exchanges between manufacturers, etc.

Nothing in this Article shall be construed to restrict or avoid sales or exchanges of commercial fertilizers to each other by importers or manufacturers who mix fertilizer materials for sale or as preventing the free and unrestricted shipments of commercial fertilizers to manufacturers who have registered their brands as required by the provisions of this Article.

History.

1947, c. 1086, s. 21; 1977, c. 303, s. 22.

§ 106-677.
Grade-tonnage reports.

Each person registering commercial fertilizers under this Article shall furnish the Commissioner with a written statement of the tonnage of each grade of fertilizer sold by him in this State. This information shall be held in confidence by the Commissioner. Said statement shall include all sales for the periods of July first to and including December thirty-first and of January first to and including June thirtieth of each year. The Commissioner may suspend, revoke or terminate the registration of said commercial fertilizer and suspend, revoke or terminate the license of any person failing to comply with this section within 30 days of the close of each period. All information published by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant to this section shall be classified so as to prevent the identification of information received from individual registrants. All information received pursuant to this section shall be held confidential by the Department and its employees.

History.

1947, c. 1086, s. 13; 1977, c. 303, s. 23; 1981, c. 448, s. 11; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-678.
Authority to regulate fertilizers.

No county, city, or other political subdivision of the State shall adopt or continue in effect any ordinance or resolution regulating the use, sale, distribution, storage, transportation, disposal, formulation, labeling, registration, manufacture, or application of fertilizer. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county, city, or other political subdivision of the State from exercising its planning and zoning authority under Article 19 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes or Article 18 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes or from exercising its fire prevention or inspection authority. Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the Department of Environmental Quality or the Environmental Management Commission to enforce water quality standards. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county, city, or other political subdivision of the State from adopting ordinances regulating fertilizers to protect water quality, provided that the ordinances have been approved by the Environmental Management Commission or the Department of Environmental Quality as part of a local plan or National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit application and do not exceed the State’s minimum requirements to protect water quality as established by the Environmental Management Commission under Part 1 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county or city from exercising its authority to regulate explosive, corrosive, inflammable, or radioactive substances pursuant to

G.S. 153A-128

or

G.S. 160A-183

.

History.

2014-103, s. 2.4(b); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§§ 106-679 through 106-699.

Reserved for future codification purposes.